Massachusetts, session 194th, S1185.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 3 of chapter 209C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by striking the fourth sentence in subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof 
the following sentence:- 
“No court shall make an order providing visitation rights to a parent who was convicted 
of rape, under sections 22 to 23B, inclusive, of chapter 265 or section 2, 3, or 4 of chapter 272, 
and is seeking to obtain visitation with the child who was conceived during the commission of 
that rape; provided, that in the absence of a conviction a court shall not make an order providing 
said visitation rights whenever clear and convincing evidence of the commission of rape can be 
established”.